Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-14] Special jurisdiction. (a)
A court of the State of Hawaii, while lacking jurisdiction under section
551G-13(1) through (3), shall have special jurisdiction to do any of the
following:

(1) Appoint a guardian in an emergency for a term not
exceeding ninety days for a respondent who is physically present in the State
of Hawaii;

(2) Issue a protective order with respect to real or
tangible personal property located in the State of Hawaii; or

(3) Appoint a guardian or conservator for an incapacitated
or protected person for whom a provisional order to transfer the proceeding
from another state has been issued under procedures similar to section 551G-21.

(b) If a petition for the appointment of a
guardian in an emergency is brought in the State of Hawaii and the State of
Hawaii was not the respondent's home state on the date the petition was filed,
the court shall dismiss the proceeding at the request of the court of the home
state, if any, whether dismissal is requested before or after the emergency
appointment. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next